New York, session 2025-2026, S10246.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 4174 of the 2 public health law, as amended by section 31 of part L of chapter 56 of 3 the laws of 2015, is amended to read as follows: 4 (b) issue certified copies or certified transcripts of birth certif- 5 icates only (1) upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction, or (2) 6 upon specific request therefor by the person, if eighteen years of age 7 or more, or by a parent or other lawful representative of the person, to 8 whom the record of birth relates including authorized representatives of 9 a local social services district if the person is in the care and custo- 10 dy or custody and guardianship of such district, or (3) upon specific 11 request therefor by the child of a deceased parent, provided such child 12 demonstrates proof of consanguinity or adoption consistent with regu- 13 lations promulgated by the commissioner, or (4) upon specific request 14 therefor by a department of a state or the federal government of the 15 United States; 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15351-02-6